Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-101.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-101.1. A. The board of education of each school
district shall permit those students and teachers who wish to do so
to participate in voluntary prayer. Nothing in this act shall be
construed to permit the school curriculum to be used to teach or
HB3240 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

incu lcate students in sectarian or religious doctrine or to be in
conflict with Section 11-101 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the boards of
education of school districts and the governing bodies of charter
schools shall adopt a policy described by subsection C of this
section requiring every public school to provide students and
employees with an opportunity to participate in a period of prayer
and reading of the Bible or other religious text on each school day
in accordance with this section. Such period may involve
opportunities for voluntary participation in individual or group
activities.
C. A policy adopted under this subsection shall include the
following statement: "It is the policy of (insert name of school
district or charter school) that every campus of (insert name of
district or school) shall provide a period of prayer and reading of
the Bible or other religious text in accordance with state law.
Such period may involve opportunities for voluntary participation in
individual or group activities."
D. A policy adopted under subsection C of this section shall:
1. Prohibit a school employee or student of the school district
or charter school from being permitted to participate in the period
of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text unless
the school employee on his or her own behalf or the parent or

HB3240 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

guar dian of the student submits to the district or school a signed
consent form that includes:
a. an acknowledgment that the school employee or student
has a choice to participate in the period of prayer
and reading of the Bible or other religious text,
b. an identification of any opportunities to engage in a
period of individual or group activities of prayer and
reading of the Bible or other religious text,
c. a statement that the school employee on his or her own
behalf or parent or guardian of the student has no
objection to participating in or hearing of the
prayers or readings offered during the period, and
d. an express waiver of the right to bring a claim under
state or federal law arising out of the adoption of a
policy under this section, including a claim under the
Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution or a related state or
federal law, releasing the district or school and
district or school employees from liability for those
claims brought in state or federal court;
2. Prohibit the provision of a prayer or reading of the Bible
or other religious text over a public address system; and


HB3240 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. Specify that a period of prayer or reading of the Bible or
other religious text shall not be a substitute for instructional
time.
E. A school employee on his or her own behalf or the parent or
guardian of a student may revoke consent provided under subsection D
of this section by informing the appropriate school administrator,
as determined by the school district or charter school. A school
employee or student for whom consent has been revoked under this
subsection:
1. Shall not participate in the period of prayer and reading of
the Bible or other religious text until the school employee or
parent or guardian of the student submits to the district or school
a new consent form; and
2. Remains bound by the waiver described by subparagraph d of
paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section.
F. 1. The policy adopted under subsection B of this section
shall include provisions ensuring a prayer or reading of the Bible
or other religious text is not knowingly or intentionally provided
in the physical presence of, within the hearing of, or in another
manner which would constitute an injury in fact within the meaning
of the United States or Oklahoma Constitution on a person for whom a
signed consent form has not been submitted or has been revoked.


HB3240 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. In order to comply with this subsection, the policy adopted
under subsection B of this section may allow that the period of
prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text be provided:
a. before normal school hours, or
b. only in classrooms or other areas in which a consent
form has been submitted for every school employee and
student, which may include an entire school district
or charter school campus if a consent form has been
submitted for each school employee and student at the
campus.
G. 1. The Attorney General, on request from the board of
education of a school district or the governing body of a charter
school, shall provide advice on best methods for a district or
school to comply with the requirements of this section and shall
defend the district or school in a cause of action arising out of
the adoption of a policy under subsection B of this section. If the
Attorney General defends a school district or open enrollment
charter school under this subsection, the state is liable for the
expenses, costs, judgments, or settlements of the claims arising out
of the representation. The Attorney General may settle or
compromise any and all claims under this subsection. The state may
not be liable for any expenses, costs, judgments, or settlements of
any claims against a district or school which is not represented by

HB3240 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the Attorney General, arising out of the adoption of a policy under
this section.
2. The Attorney General's office shall provide a model consent
form that may be used for purposes of providing consent under
subsection D of this section.
H. This section shall not prohibit a school employee or student
of the district or school from participating in prayer or reading
the Bible or other religious text during a period of the school day
that is not designated as a period of prayer and reading of the
Bible or other religious text.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.











HB3240 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.